California, session 20252026, SB409.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 20123 of the Public Contract Code is amended to read:20123. (a) In counties containing a population of 2,000,000 or over, as determined by the last federal or special census or subsequent estimate validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance, Sections 20121 and 20122 do not apply to alteration or repair work upon county-owned buildings, if the cost of the work is under fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in a county with a population of 9,000,000 or over, as determined by the last federal or special census or subsequent estimate validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance, Sections 20121 and 20122 do not apply to the alteration or repair work upon county-owned buildings, if the cost of the work is under one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000). (2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the amount described in subdivision (a) of Section 22032 is equal to or exceeds one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000). SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the following unique needs of the County of Los Angeles:(a) Spanning over 4,000 square miles, the County of Los Angeles is the most populous county in the United States.(b) With a population of nearly 10 million residents, the County of Los Angeles surpasses all other counties in the United States in terms of population and encompasses more than a quarter of California’s population.(c) Given the sheer size of its population and the vast infrastructure for critical public services delivery, it is important to ensure that Los Angeles County facilities remain operational and effective at all times to meet community needs.